Washington statutes.
RCW 7.60.120

Utility service.

A utility providing service to estate property may not alter, refuse, or discontinue service to the property without first giving the receiver fifteen days' notice of any default or intention to alter, refuse, or discontinue service to estate property. This section does not prohibit the court, upon motion by the receiver, to prohibit the alteration or cessation of utility service if the receiver can furnish adequate assurance of payment, in the form of deposit or other security, for service to be provided after entry of the order appointing the receiver.

[ 2004 c 165 s 14.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—2004 c 165: See notes following RCW 7.60.005.